Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 17

Innkeeper's Lien

66-17-101. Scope of lien.

All keepers of hotels, boardinghouses, and lodging houses, whether licensed or not, shall have a lien on all furniture, baggage, wearing apparel, or other goods and chattels brought into any such hotel, boardinghouse, or lodginghouse, by any guest or patron of the same, to secure the payment by such guest of all sums due for board or lodging.

Acts 1879, ch. 109, § 1; Shan., § 3590; Code 1932, § 8012; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1701.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Sale of baggage of person fraudulently obtaining credit, §62-7-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1977).

66-17-102. Time of attachment.

The lien shall attach in all cases where a liability has been created, without regard to the time of such board or lodging.

Acts 1879, ch. 109, § 1; Shan., § 3591; Code 1932, § 8013; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1702.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.